hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Videopribor > Dijelovi i dodaci za televizore: Nosači za TV i monitore; Kutije za TV konvertere; Zaštite za TV; Dekorativni okviri i držači za TV; LED trake i šipke za pozadinsko osvjetljenje TV-a; Zamjenske žarulje za TV; Zamjenski zvučnici za TV; Zamjenski stalci i držač za TV
de: Elektronik > Video > Videozubehör > TV-Zubehör: TV- & Monitorhalterungen; TV-Konverter & Receiver; TV-Abdeckungen; TV-Zierrahmen und -Blenden; TV-LED-Hintergrundbeleuchtungsstreifen und -leisten; Ersatzlampen für Fernseher; TV-Lautsprecher; TV-Ersatzständer und -beine
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Phụ kiện hình ảnh > Phụ tùng và phụ kiện tivi: Giá đỡ TV và màn hình; Bộ chuyển đổi tín hiệu sang tivi; Vỏ bảo vệ TV; Khung và viền trang trí TV; Thanh và dải đèn nền LED TV; Đèn hình tivi thay thế; Loa TV thay thế; Chân và giá đỡ thay thế TV
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Acessórios vídeo > Acessórios e peças de televisão: Suportes de monitor e TV; Caixas de conversor de TV; Capas de TV; Molduras e aros decorativos de TV; Tiras e barras de retroiluminação LED de TV; Lâmpadas de substituição de TV; Altifalantes de substituição de TV; Bases e pés de substituição de TV
pl: Elektronika > Video > Akcesoria do wideo > Akcesoria i części do telewizorów: Uchwyty do telewizorów i monitorów; Konwertery telewizyjne; Pokrywy telewizora; Dekoracyjne ramy i ramki telewizora; Paski i słupki podświetlenia LED do telewizora; Wymienne lampy do telewizorów; Wymienne głośniki do telewizorów; Wymienne stojaki i nogi telewizora
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Videotarvikkeet > Television osat ja tarvikkeet: TV- ja monitoritelineet; TV:n digiboxit; TV-suojus; TV-koristekehys ja kehysreuna; TV-LED-taustavalonauha ja kisko; TV:n varaosalamput; TV:n varaosakaiuttimet; TV-vaihtoteline ja jalka
cs: Elektronika > Video > Videopříslušenství > Díly a příslušenství k televizorům: Držáky na televize a monitory; Set-top boxy; Kryty na televize; Dekorativní rámy a rámeček televize; LED podsvícení pásy a lišty televize; Náhradní lampy do projekčních televizorů; Náhradní reproduktory k televizím; Náhradní stojany a nohy televize
da: Elektronik > Video > Video – tilbehør > TV – reservedele og tilbehør: Tv- og skærmbeslag; Modtagerbokse; TV-overtræk; TV-dekorationsrammer og bezels; TV-LED-baggrundsbelysningsstrips og -stænger; Tv-pærer; Integrerbare højttalere til fjernsyn; TV-udskiftningsstandere og -ben
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Vaizdo įrangos priedai > Televizorių dalys ir priedai: Televizorių ir monitorių laikikliai; TV keitikliai; Televizorių uždangalai; Televizorių dekoratyviniai rėmeliai ir apvadai; Televizorių LED fono apšvietimo juostos; Atsarginės televizorių lemputės; Atsarginiai televizorių garsiakalbiai; Televizorių pakaitiniai stovai ir kojelės
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Acessórios para vídeo > Acessórios e peças para televisão: Suportes para televisão e monitor; Conversores scan para TV; Capas para TV; Molduras e aros decorativos para TV; Tiras e barras de iluminação LED para TV; Lâmpadas de reposição para televisão; Alto-falantes de reposição para televisão; Suportes e pés de substituição para TV
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Αξεσουάρ βίντεο > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ τηλεόρασης: Βάσεις τηλεόρασης και οθονών; Μετατροπείς τηλεοπτικών σημάτων; Καλύμματα τηλεόρασης; Διακοσμητικά πλαίσια & στεφάνες συγκράτησης τηλεόρασης; Ταινίες & μπάρες οπίσθιου φωτισμού LED για τηλεόραση; Ανταλλακτικές λάμπες τηλεοράσεων; Ανταλλακτικές λάμπες ηχείων; Ανταλλακτικές βάσεις & πόδια τηλεόρασης
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 摄影摄像配件 > 电视机零件/配件: 电视机/显示器支架; 电视转换器; 电视罩; 电视装饰框和边框; 电视 LED 背光条; 背投电视灯泡; 电视扬声器替换; 电视替换支架和支腿
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Video príslušenstvo > TV diely a príslušenstvo: Držiaky TV a monitorov; TV konvertorové boxy; Kryty televízorov; Ozdobné rámy a rámčeky televízorov; LED podsvietovacie pásy a lišty televízorov; Náhradné lampy pre TV; Náhradné TV reproduktory; Náhradné stojany a nohy televízorov
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > 映像機器関連用品 > テレビパーツ・関連用品: テレビ・モニター用取付金具; TVスキャンコンバーター; テレビカバー; テレビ装飾フレームとベゼル; テレビLEDバックライトストリップとバー; 交換用TV内蔵ランプ; 交換用TV内蔵スピーカー; テレビ交換用スタンドと脚部
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > อุปกรณ์วิดีโอ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ทีวี: แท่นยึดทีวีและจอภาพ; กล่องเครื่องมือแปลง TV; ผ้าคลุมทีวี; กรอบและขอบตกแต่งทีวี; แถบและแท่งไฟแบ็คไลท์ LED ทีวี; หลอดอะไหล่ TV; ลำโพงอะไหล่สำหรับทีวี; ขาตั้งและขาทีวีทดแทน
es: Electrónica > Video > Accesorios de vídeo > Accesorios y piezas para televisores: Soportes para monitores y televisor; Decodificadores para TV; Cubiertas de TV; Marcos decorativos y biseles de TV; Tiras y barras de retroiluminación LED de TV; Lámparas de repuesto para el televisor; Altavoces de repuesto para TV; Soportes y patas de repuesto de TV
sv: Elektronik > Video > Videotillbehör > Tv-tillbehör: Fästen för TV och skärmar; Tv-konverteringsboxar; TV-skydd; Dekorativa TV-ramar och bezlar; TV-LED-bakgrundsljusremsor och -lister; Ersättningslampor till TV-apparater; Ersättningshögtalare för TV-apparater; TV-ersättningsstativ och -ben
nl: Elektronica > Video > Videoaccessoires > Televisieonderdelen en -accessoires: Tv-steunen; Tv-scanomvormers; Tv-hoezen; Tv decoratieve lijsten en randen; Tv led-backlightstrips en balken; Vervangende lampen voor televisies; Vervangende luidsprekers voor televisies; Tv vervangingsstatieven en poten
it: Elettronica > Video > Accessori video > Accessori e componenti per TV: Supporti TV; Decoder TV; Copritelevisori; Cornici decorative e bezel per TV; Strisce e barre retroilluminate a LED per TV; Lampade ricambio televisori; Altoparlanti sostitutivi per televisori; Supporti e gambe di ricambio per TV
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Accessoires vidéo > Accessoires et pièces pour téléviseurs: Supports pour téléviseurs et écrans; Adaptateurs TV; Housses de téléviseur; Cadres et encadrements décoratifs de téléviseur; Bandes et barres de rétroéclairage LED de téléviseur; Lampes de rechange pour téléviseur; Enceintes pour téléviseur; Supports et pieds de remplacement pour téléviseur
tr: Elektronik > Video > Video Aksesuarları > Televizyon Parçaları ve Aksesuarları: Televizyon ve Monitör Montaj Kitleri; Televizyon Tarama Çeviricileri; TV Örtüleri; TV Dekoratif Çerçeveleri ve Kenarları; TV LED Arka Işık Şeritleri ve Çubukları; Televizyon Yedek Lambaları; TV Yedek Hoparlörleri; TV Yedek Ayakları ve Bacakları
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Video dodatki > Deli in dodatki za televizorje: Nosilci za televizorje in monitorje; TV pretvorniki; Prevleke za televizorje; Dekorativni okvirji in robovi za televizorje; LED trakovi in letve za osvetlitev televizorjev; Nadomestne svetilke za televizorje; Nadomestni zvočniki za televizorje; Nadomestna stojala in noge za televizorje
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 視訊配件 > 電視零件/配件: 電視/螢幕架; 電視轉換盒; 電視罩; 電視裝飾框及邊框; 電視 LED 背光帶; 電視替換燈管; 電視替換喇叭; 電視替換架及腳
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Accesorii video > Piese și accesorii pentru televizoare: Suporturi TV și monitor; Cutii conversie TV; Huse pentru televizoare; Rame și cadre decorative pentru televizoare; Benzi și bare LED pentru iluminarea televizoarelor; Lămpi de schimb pentru televizoare; Difuzoare de schimb pentru televizoare; Suporturi și picioare de înlocuire pentru televizoare
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Videotilbehør > TV-deler og -tilbehør: TV- og skjermfester; TV-konverterbokser; TV-deksler; Dekorative rammer og kanter til TV; LED-striper og -stenger til TV; Erstatningslamper til TV-er; Erstatningshøyttalere til TV-er; Erstatningsstativer og -føtter til TV
en: Electronics > Video > Video Accessories > Television Parts & Accessories: TV & Monitor Mounts; TV Converter Boxes; TV Covers; TV Decorative Frames & Bezels; TV LED Backlight Strips & Bars; TV Replacement Lamps; TV Replacement Speakers; TV Replacement Stands & Legs
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Видео аксесоари > Телевизионни части и аксесоари: Стойки за телевизор и монитор; Телевизионни конверторни кутии; Покривала за телевизор; Декоративни рамки и лайстни за телевизор; LED ленти и лайстни за фоново осветление на телевизор; Резервни лампи за телевизор; Резервни говорители за телевизор; Резервни стойки и крака за телевизор
hu: Elektronika > Videó > Videókiegészítők > Televízió-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők: TV- és monitorrögzítők; TV átalakító dobozok; TV-takarók; TV dekoratív keretek és szegélyek; TV LED háttérvilágítás-csíkok és -sávok; TV-cserelámpák; TV-cserehangszórók; TV csereállványok és -lábak
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 비디오 부대용품 > 텔레비전 부품/부대용품: TV/모니터 마운트; TV 컨버터 박스; TV 커버; TV 장식 프레임 및 베젤; TV LED 백라이트 스트립 및 바; TV 교체용 램프; TV 교체 스피커; TV 교체 스탠드 및 다리
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Аксессуары для видеоаппаратуры > Детали и аксессуары для телевизоров: Крепления для телевизоров и мониторов; Телевизионные приставки; Чехлы для телевизоров; Декоративные рамки и панели для телевизоров; Светодиодные ленты и планки подсветки для телевизоров; Лампы для телевизоров; Динамики для телевизоров; Сменные подставки и ножки для телевизоров